Utah statutes.
78A-12-202.   Salary and expenses -- Staff.
(1)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(2)  The commission shall elect a chair from among its members.
(3)  The commission shall employ an executive director and may employ
additional staff as necessary within budgetary constraints.
(4)  The commission shall be located in the Commission on Criminal and
Juvenile Justice.
